es: Material de la envoltura del dirigible: Algodón (histórico); Dacron (poliéster); Película de Mylar (PET); Tela recubierta de neopreno; Nailon (recubierto de PU); Poliéster (recubierto de PU); Película de poliuretano (PU); Película de Tedlar (PVF); Otro
el: Υλικό περιβλήματος αερόπλοιου: Βαμβάκι (ιστορικό); Dacron (πολυεστέρας); Μεμβράνη Mylar (PET); Ύφασμα με επικάλυψη νεοπρενίου; Νάιλον (με επικάλυψη PU); Πολυεστέρας (με επικάλυψη PU); Μεμβράνη πολυουρεθάνης (PU); Μεμβράνη Tedlar (PVF); Άλλο
fi: Ilmalaivan vaipan materiaali: Puuvilla (historiallinen); Dacron (polyesteri); Mylar (PET) -kalvo; Neopreenipinnoitettu kangas; Nailon (PU-pinnoitettu); Polyesteri (PU-pinnoitettu); Polyuretaani (PU) -kalvo; Tedlar (PVF) -kalvo; Muu
bg-BG: Материал за обвивка на дирижабъла: Памук (исторически); Dacron (полиестер); Mylar (PET) филм; Плат с неопреново покритие; Найлон (с PU покритие); Полиестер (с PU покритие); Полиуретанов (PU) филм; Tedlar (PVF) филм; Друго
sl-SI: Material ovoja zračne ladje: Bombaž (zgodovinsko); Dacron (poliester); Folija iz Mylarja (PET); Tkanina, prevlečena z neoprenom; Najlon (s premazom PU); Poliester (s premazom PU); Poliuretanska folija (PU); Folija iz Tedlarja (PVF); Drugo
ro-RO: Materialul învelișului zepelinului: Bumbac (istoric); Dacron (poliester); Folie Mylar (PET); Țesătură acoperită cu neopren; Nailon (acoperit cu PU); Poliester (acoperit cu PU); Folie de poliuretan (PU); Folie Tedlar (PVF); Altele
zh-TW: 飛艇氣囊材質: 棉布 (具歷史意義); Dacron (聚酯纖維); Mylar (PET) 薄膜; 氯丁橡膠塗層布料; 尼龍 (PU 塗層); 聚酯纖維 (PU 塗層); 聚氨酯 (PU) 薄膜; Tedlar (PVF) 薄膜; 其他
ko: 비행선 외피 재질: 면(역사적); Dacron(폴리에스터); 마일라(PET) 필름; 네오프렌 코팅 패브릭; 나일론(PU 코팅); 폴리에스터(PU 코팅); 폴리우레탄(PU) 필름; 테들라(PVF) 필름; 기타
lt-LT: Dirižablio apvalkalo medžiaga: Medvilnė (istorinė); Dacron (poliesteris); Mylar (PET) plėvelė; Neoprenu dengtas audinys; Nailonas (dengtas PU); Poliesteris (dengtas PU); Poliuretano (PU) plėvelė; Tedlar (PVF) plėvelė; Kita
nb: Luftskipets konvoluttmateriale: Bomull (historisk); Dacron (polyester); Mylar (PET)-film; Neoprenbelagt stoff; Nylon (PU-belagt); Polyester (PU-belagt); Polyuretan (PU)-film; Tedlar (PVF)-film; Annet
hu: Léghajó burkolat anyaga: Pamut (történelmi); Dacron (poliészter); Mylar (PET) fólia; Neoprén bevonatú szövet; Nejlon (PU-bevonatos); Poliészter (PU-bevonatos); Poliuretán (PU) fólia; Tedlar (PVF) fólia; Egyéb
th: วัสดุโครงหุ้มเรือเหาะ: ผ้าฝ้าย (แบบดั้งเดิม); Dacron (โพลีเอสเตอร์); ฟิล์ม Mylar (PET); ผ้าเคลือบยางนีโอพรีน; ไนลอน (เคลือบ PU); โพลีเอสเตอร์ (เคลือบ PU); ฟิล์มโพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ฟิล์ม Tedlar (PVF); อื่นๆ
en: Airship envelope material: Cotton (historical); Dacron (polyester); Mylar (PET) film; Neoprene-coated fabric; Nylon (PU-coated); Polyester (PU-coated); Polyurethane (PU) film; Tedlar (PVF) film; Other
pt-BR: Material de envelope de dirigível: Algodão (histórico); Dacron (poliéster); Filme de Mylar (PET); Tecido revestido de neoprene; Nylon (revestimento em PU); Poliéster (revestido com PU); Filme de poliuretano (PU); Filme de Tedlar (PVF); Outro
pt-PT: Material da envolvente do dirigível: Algodão (histórico); Dacron (poliéster); Película de Mylar (PET); Tecido revestido a neopreno; Nylon (revestido a PU); Poliéster (revestido a PU); Película de poliuretano (PU); Película de Tedlar (PVF); Outro
vi: Vật liệu vỏ khí cầu: Bông (lịch sử); Dacron (polyester); Màng Mylar (PET); Vải tráng neoprene; Nylon (phủ PU); Polyester (phủ PU); Màng polyurethane (PU); Màng Tedlar (PVF); Khác
da: Luftskibets hylstermateriale: Bomuld (historisk); Dacron (polyester); Mylar-film (PET); Neoprenbelagt stof; Nylon (PU-belagt); Polyester (PU-belagt); Polyurethan-film (PU); Tedlar-film (PVF); Andet
nl: Materiaal luchtschipomhulsel: Katoen (historisch); Dacron (polyester); Mylar (PET)-folie; Stof met neopreencoating; Nylon (PU-gecoat); Polyester (PU-gecoat); Polyurethaan (PU) folie; Tedlar (PVF)-folie; Overig
pl: Materiał powłoki sterowca: Bawełna (historyczne); Dacron (poliester); Folia mylarowa (PET); Tkanina powlekana neoprenem; Nylon (powlekany PU); Poliester (powlekany PU); Folia poliuretanowa (PU); Folia Tedlar (PVF); Inne
ru: Материал оболочки дирижабля: Хлопок (исторический); Dacron (полиэстер); Пленка Mylar (PET); Ткань с неопреновым покрытием; Нейлон (с покрытием PU); Полиэстер (с покрытием PU); Полиуретановая (PU) пленка; Пленка Tedlar (PVF); Другое
de: Material für die Luftschiffhülle: Baumwolle (historisch); Dacron (Polyester); Mylar-Folie (PET); Neoprenbeschichtetes Gewebe; Nylon (PU-beschichtet); Polyester (PU-beschichtet); Polyurethan-Folie (PU); Tedlar-Folie (PVF); Sonstige
sv: Flygplanets höljematerial: Bomull (historisk); Dacron (polyester); Mylar (PET)-film; Neoprenbelagt tyg; Nylon (PU-belagd); Polyester (PU-belagd); Polyuretanfilm (PU); Tedlar-film (PVF); Annat
cs: Materiál obalu vzducholodi: Bavlna (historická); Dacron (polyester); Mylarová (PET) fólie; Tkanina potažená neoprenem; Nylon (s PU vrstvou); Polyester (s PU vrstvou); Polyuretanová (PU) fólie; Tedlarová (PVF) fólie; Jiné
hr-HR: Materijal ovojnice zračnog broda: Pamuk (povijesno); Dacron (poliester); Mylar (PET) film; Tkanina premazana neoprenom; Najlon (premazan PU-om); Poliester (premazan PU-om); Poliuretanski (PU) film; Tedlar (PVF) film; Ostalo
it: materiale di rivestimento del dirigibile: Cotone (storico); Dacron (poliestere); Pellicola in Mylar (PET); Tessuto spalmato in neoprene; Nylon (spalmato in PU); Poliestere (spalmato in PU); Pellicola in poliuretano (PU); Pellicola in Tedlar (PVF); Altro
tr: Hava gemisi zarf malzemesi: Pamuk (tarihi); Dacron (polyester); Mylar (PET) film; Neopren kaplamalı kumaş; Naylon (PU kaplamalı); Polyester (PU kaplamalı); Poliüretan (PU) film; Tedlar (PVF) film; Diğer
ja: 飛行船の外皮素材: コットン (歴史的); Dacron (ポリエステル); マイラー (PET) フィルム; ネオプレンコーティング生地; ナイロン (PUコーティング); ポリエステル (PUコーティング); ポリウレタン (PU) フィルム; テドラー (PVF) フィルム; その他
sk-SK: Materiál plášťa vzducholode: Bavlna (historické); Dacron (polyester); Fólia z mylaru (PET); Tkanina potiahnutá neoprénom; Nylón (potiahnutý PU); Polyester (potiahnutý PU); Fólia z polyuretánu (PU); Fólia z tedlaru (PVF); Iný
fr: Matériau de la toile du dirigeable: Coton (historique); Dacron (polyester); Film Mylar (PET); Tissu enduit de néoprène; Nylon (enduit de PU); Polyester (enduit de PU); Film de polyuréthane (PU); Film Tedlar (PVF); Autre
zh-CN: 飞艇气囊材质: 棉（复古材料）; Dacron（聚酯纤维）; Mylar (PET) 薄膜; 氯丁橡胶涂层织物; 尼龙（PU 涂层）; 聚酯纤维（PU 涂层）; 聚氨酯 (PU) 薄膜; Tedlar (PVF) 薄膜; 其他